Wisconsin, session 2025, SB255.
do enact as follows:SB255,11Section 1. 182.71 (1) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 182.71 (1) (ar).SB255,22Section 2. 182.71 (1) (ag) of the statutes is created to read:SB255,2,43182.71 (1) (ag) “Capital invested” means capital actually paid in and the par 4value of all negotiable bonds or other obligations issued by the company.SB255,35Section 3. 182.71 (5) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB255,3,46182.71 (5) (b) If the company operates water reservoirs under this section 7capable of storing and discharging 1.5 billion cubic feet of water that would not be 8naturally stored, it may charge uniform tolls to the owners, lessees or operators of 9every improved and operated water power located upon the Chippewa or Flambeau 10rivers or any of their tributaries below any of these reservoirs and benefited by the 11operation of these reservoirs. The sum of the tolls may not exceed the reasonable 12costs of operation and maintenance including taxes, depreciation, and rent paid for 1leased properties and, plus a net annual return on the cash capital actually paid in 2on the stock subscriptions to the company and on the par value of all negotiable 3bonds issued by the company capital invested and a reasonable allowance for 4working capital. The commission shall determine the net annual return.SB255,45Section 4. 182.71 (5) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB255,3,146182.71 (5) (c) The commission shall fix the tolls semiannually in proportion to 7the benefits received from the reservoir system by each improved and operated 8water power. A water power liable to tolls and operated 2 months or more during a 96-month toll period shall not be subject to tolls for the entire period. A water power 10operating for less than 2 months during a 6-month toll period shall not be subject to 11a toll. The company shall employ hydraulic engineers, selected by the commission, 12to assist the company and the commission in determining the tolls to be charged. 13The expense of employing the engineers shall be a part of the cost of maintenance 14and operation of the works.SB255,515Section 5. 182.71 (5) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:SB255,3,2016182.71 (5) (f) No tolls shall be levied or used to pay for any part of the original 17acquisition or improvement of the reservoir system. The tolls shall be a lien on the 18water power, dam, franchises and flowage rights of the person or corporation 19charged with the tolls. The company may sue to enforce the lien or for the sale of 20the encumbered property.SB255,621Section 6. 182.71 (6) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB255,3,2422182.71 (6) (intro.) On or before June 15 and December 15 of each year, the 23company shall provide the commission with a statement showing all of the 24following:SB255,71Section 7. 182.71 (6) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB255,4,42182.71 (6) (a) All expenditures made or necessary to be made for the 6-month 3period preceding the next July 1 or January 1 for maintenance and, operation, and 4depreciation of the reservoir system.SB255,85Section 8. 182.71 (6) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:SB255,4,116182.71 (6) (f) A recommendation of the amount of tolls necessary to pay the 7cost of maintenance and, operation and, taxes and depreciation, a net return of 6 8percent per year on the capital invested, including the par value of the outstanding 9negotiable bonds and a reasonable allowance for working capital, together with a 10recommendation as to the apportionment of the tolls against the owners or 11operators of improved powers under sub. (5); and.SB255,912Section 9. 182.71 (7) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB255,4,2013182.71 (7) (c) The company may, after certification from the commission 14according to the procedures under ss. 201.03 to 201.04, issue capital stock or 15negotiable bonds. The money received by the company upon account of capital stock 16or sale of its negotiable bonds shall be used to pay the original cost of purchase, 17construction, or improvement of the reservoir system. All tolls collected under sub. 18(5) shall be applied only to the payment of cost of maintenance and operation of the 19system and payment of the net return on capital so that the capital stock and bonds 20of the corporation shall be maintained at par value at all times.SB255,1021Section 10. 182.71 (7) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB255,5,522182.71 (7) (d) Subject to approval of the commission, the company may issue 23negotiable interest-bearing bonds to provide funds to acquire dams, reservoirs, and 24rights under this section. The issue shall not exceed one-half of the total cost of the 1improvement. The company may secure payment by mortgage of its property. If 2any bonds are issued and outstanding, all earnings of the capital stock shall be 3invested subject to the approval of the commission as a sinking fund for the purpose 4of retiring outstanding bonds, and while any bonds are outstanding, no dividends 5shall be paid to the stockholders of record.SB255,116Section 11. 182.71 (8) of the statutes is amended to read:SB255,5,147182.71 (8) This state shall have the right at any time, whenever it may have 8the constitutional power, to take over to itself and become owner of all reservoirs 9and other works and property acquired by the Chippewa and Flambeau 10Improvement Company, under this section, by paying therefor the cash capital 11actually paid on the capital stock of total capital invested by the company 12theretofore lawfully issued and outstanding or the actual value of the physical 13properties so taken over and without any allowance for franchises or goodwill of the 14business, such actual value to be determined by the commission.SB255,5,1515